HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  10766 Y 1
SFX  10766 0 ינון/64992 .
SFX  11640 Y 1
SFX  11640 0 וביכן/64993 .
SFX  8276 Y 1
SFX  8276 0 מותיך/64991 .
SFX  6862 Y 1
SFX  6862 0 מותיך/64993 .
SFX  7523 Y 1
SFX  7523 0 פויותיך/64993 .
SFX  7357 Y 1
SFX  7357 0 ותית/64991 .
SFX  9606 Y 1
SFX  9606 0 יתוהו/64992 .
SFX  12895 Y 1
SFX  12895 0 ימנו/64991 .
SFX  12536 Y 1
SFX  12536 0 ידותיי/64991 .
SFX  5930 Y 1
SFX  5930 0 ימנו/64992 .
SFX  7938 Y 1
SFX  7938 0 ימנו/64993 .
SFX  13449 Y 1
SFX  13449 0 ידותיי/64993 .
SFX  12233 Y 1
SFX  12233 0 יחתנו/64991 .
SFX  13959 Y 1
SFX  13959 ם ננה/64992 .
SFX  10722 Y 1
SFX  10722 0 יחתנו/64992 .
SFX  10262 Y 1
SFX  10262 0 אוני/64992 .
SFX  9834 Y 1
SFX  9834 0 ימנו/64998 .
SFX  9234 Y 1
SFX  9234 0 אוני/64993 .
SFX  11036 Y 1
SFX  11036 0 ימנו/64999 .
SFX  12415 Y 1
SFX  12415 0 גותיכם/64991 .
SFX  7302 Y 1
SFX  7302 0 רתון/64992 .
SFX  8048 Y 1
SFX  8048 0 גותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8424 Y 1
SFX  8424 ו ינוה/64992 .
SFX  7662 Y 1
SFX  7662 ה ורה/64993 .
SFX  7194 Y 1
SFX  7194 0 נויותיכן/64993 .
SFX  8858 Y 1
SFX  8858 0 חוכם/64992 .
SFX  12143 Y 1
SFX  12143 0 נותיהן/64991 .
SFX  7123 Y 1
SFX  7123 0 נותיהן/64993 .
SFX  11822 Y 1
SFX  11822 ב ובים/64991 .
SFX  8944 Y 1
SFX  8944 0 וע/64991 .
SFX  5791 Y 1
SFX  5791 0 וע/64992 .
SFX  7521 Y 1
SFX  7521 0 פויותיכן/64993 .
SFX  12043 Y 1
SFX  12043 0 יביו/64991 .
SFX  6242 Y 1
SFX  6242 0 זיכן/64991 .
SFX  13978 Y 1
SFX  13978 0 זיכן/64992 .
SFX  12494 Y 1
SFX  12494 0 יביו/64993 .
SFX  12458 Y 1
SFX  12458 0 יעיה/64991 .
SFX  5782 Y 1
SFX  5782 0 זיכן/64993 .
SFX  13631 Y 1
SFX  13631 0 יעיה/64992 .
SFX  13170 Y 1
SFX  13170 0 יעיה/64993 .
SFX  9470 Y 1
SFX  9470 0 יעיה/64994 .
SFX  9312 Y 1
SFX  9312 ר שר/64991 .
SFX  10882 Y 1
SFX  10882 ך כתך/64992 .
SFX  5054 Y 1
SFX  5054 ר שר/64992 .
SFX  8275 Y 1
SFX  8275 0 מותיכם/64991 .
SFX  6861 Y 1
SFX  6861 0 מותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8422 Y 1
SFX  8422 ו ינוך/64992 .
SFX  7929 Y 1
SFX  7929 ם מר/64992 .
SFX  10883 Y 1
SFX  10883 ך כתו/64992 .
SFX  12821 Y 1
SFX  12821 0 ננת/64991 .
SFX  12232 Y 1
SFX  12232 0 יחתני/64991 .
SFX  10988 Y 1
SFX  10988 0 ננת/64992 .
SFX  10721 Y 1
SFX  10721 0 יחתני/64992 .
SFX  12350 Y 1
SFX  12350 0 דכן/64991 .
SFX  8014 Y 1
SFX  8014 0 בד/64992 .
SFX  11479 Y 1
SFX  11479 0 בד/64993 .
SFX  5327 Y 1
SFX  5327 0 דכן/64992 .
SFX  6988 Y 1
SFX  6988 0 דכן/64993 .
SFX  12414 Y 1
SFX  12414 0 גותיכן/64991 .
SFX  7301 Y 1
SFX  7301 0 רתונו/64992 .
SFX  8047 Y 1
SFX  8047 0 גותיכן/64993 .
SFX  6221 Y 1
SFX  6221 0 זך/64991 .
SFX  6650 Y 1
SFX  6650 0 זך/64992 .
SFX  8423 Y 1
SFX  8423 ו ינוהו/64992 .
SFX  7074 Y 1
SFX  7074 0 דכן/64998 .
SFX  5774 Y 1
SFX  5774 0 זך/64993 .
SFX  7193 Y 1
SFX  7193 0 נויותינו/64993 .
SFX  12142 Y 1
SFX  12142 0 נותיי/64991 .
SFX  12041 Y 1
SFX  12041 0 יביך/64991 .
SFX  11118 Y 1
SFX  11118 0 זך/64998 .
SFX  12770 Y 1
SFX  12770 ח יעך/64991 .
SFX  12492 Y 1
SFX  12492 0 יביך/64993 .
SFX  7122 Y 1
SFX  7122 0 נותיי/64993 .
SFX  6681 Y 1
SFX  6681 ח יעך/64992 .
SFX  11217 Y 1
SFX  11217 ח יעך/64993 .
SFX  13285 Y 1
SFX  13285 ה וקן/64991 .
SFX  9995 Y 1
SFX  9995 ח יעך/64998 .
SFX  8273 Y 1
SFX  8273 0 מותינו/64991 .
SFX  7520 Y 1
SFX  7520 0 פויותינו/64993 .
SFX  6859 Y 1
SFX  6859 0 מותינו/64993 .
SFX  12042 Y 1
SFX  12042 0 יבייך/64991 .
SFX  12493 Y 1
SFX  12493 0 יבייך/64993 .
SFX  12457 Y 1
SFX  12457 0 יעינו/64991 .
SFX  5587 Y 1
SFX  5587 ו זרם/64993 .
SFX  13630 Y 1
SFX  13630 0 יעינו/64992 .
SFX  13169 Y 1
SFX  13169 0 יעינו/64993 .
SFX  9469 Y 1
SFX  9469 0 יעינו/64994 .
SFX  8373 Y 1
SFX  8373 0 איכם/64991 .
SFX  13822 Y 1
SFX  13822 0 איכם/64992 .
SFX  10900 Y 1
SFX  10900 ך כתכם/64992 .
SFX  8118 Y 1
SFX  8118 0 איכם/64993 .
SFX  8274 Y 1
SFX  8274 0 מותיכן/64991 .
SFX  6860 Y 1
SFX  6860 0 מותיכן/64993 .
SFX  8421 Y 1
SFX  8421 ו ינוכם/64992 .
SFX  6799 Y 1
SFX  6799 0 צהו/64992 .
SFX  13476 Y 1
SFX  13476 ן נסה/64991 .
SFX  12731 Y 1
SFX  12731 0 יטות/64991 .
SFX  5977 Y 1
SFX  5977 0 בותך/64993 .
SFX  12931 Y 1
SFX  12931 ב יב/64991 .
SFX  6843 Y 1
SFX  6843 ב יב/64992 .
SFX  7300 Y 1
SFX  7300 0 רתוני/64992 .
SFX  9289 Y 1
SFX  9289 ב יב/64993 .
SFX  6220 Y 1
SFX  6220 0 זכם/64991 .
SFX  6649 Y 1
SFX  6649 0 זכם/64992 .
SFX  6311 Y 1
SFX  6311 0 סתי/64992 .
SFX  5773 Y 1
SFX  5773 0 זכם/64993 .
SFX  7826 Y 1
SFX  7826 0 סתי/64993 .
SFX  12141 Y 1
SFX  12141 0 נותייך/64991 .
SFX  12040 Y 1
SFX  12040 0 יבתם/64991 .
SFX  11117 Y 1
SFX  11117 0 זכם/64998 .
SFX  10660 Y 1
SFX  10660 0 יבתם/64992 .
SFX  12769 Y 1
SFX  12769 ח יעכם/64991 .
SFX  11359 Y 1
SFX  11359 0 סתי/64999 .
SFX  7121 Y 1
SFX  7121 0 נותייך/64993 .
SFX  11838 Y 1
SFX  11838 ך לו/64992 .
SFX  6680 Y 1
SFX  6680 ח יעכם/64992 .
SFX  11216 Y 1
SFX  11216 ח יעכם/64993 .
SFX  10933 Y 1
SFX  10933 0 בונו/64992 .
SFX  13231 Y 1
SFX  13231 0 בונו/64993 .
SFX  11639 Y 1
SFX  11639 0 ובינו/64993 .
SFX  9994 Y 1
SFX  9994 ח יעכם/64998 .
SFX  8884 Y 1
SFX  8884 ד ורה/64993 .
SFX  13942 Y 1
SFX  13942 0 פתי/64991 .
SFX  13235 Y 1
SFX  13235 0 פלו/64991 .
SFX  9866 Y 1
SFX  9866 0 פלו/64992 .
SFX  5865 Y 1
SFX  5865 0 פתי/64992 .
SFX  12953 Y 1
SFX  12953 0 פלו/64993 .
SFX  8267 Y 1
SFX  8267 0 מתכן/64991 .
SFX  7454 Y 1
SFX  7454 0 פתי/64993 .
SFX  9262 Y 1
SFX  9262 0 מתכן/64992 .
SFX  13826 Y 1
SFX  13826 ו זרנה/64992 .
SFX  6855 Y 1
SFX  6855 0 מתכן/64993 .
SFX  12100 Y 1
SFX  12100 0 ישים/64991 .
SFX  13773 Y 1
SFX  13773 0 ישים/64992 .
SFX  11301 Y 1
SFX  11301 0 פלו/64999 .
SFX  10228 Y 1
SFX  10228 0 ישים/64994 .
SFX  8372 Y 1
SFX  8372 0 איכן/64991 .
SFX  13821 Y 1
SFX  13821 0 איכן/64992 .
SFX  10899 Y 1
SFX  10899 ך כתכן/64992 .
SFX  9563 Y 1
SFX  9563 0 עתוהו/64992 .
SFX  8117 Y 1
SFX  8117 0 איכן/64993 .
SFX  12729 Y 1
SFX  12729 0 יטיהן/64991 .
SFX  13520 Y 1
SFX  13520 0 יטיהן/64993 .
SFX  12012 Y 1
SFX  12012 0 ציו/64991 .
SFX  9564 Y 1
SFX  9564 0 עתוה/64992 .
SFX  7169 Y 1
SFX  7169 0 ציו/64993 .
SFX  12730 Y 1
SFX  12730 0 יטיהם/64991 .
SFX  13521 Y 1
SFX  13521 0 יטיהם/64993 .
SFX  12633 Y 1
SFX  12633 0 טינו/64991 .
SFX  12523 Y 1
SFX  12523 0 בש/64991 .
SFX  11267 Y 1
SFX  11267 0 טינו/64992 .
SFX  5790 Y 1
SFX  5790 0 בש/64992 .
SFX  11291 Y 1
SFX  11291 0 בש/64993 .
SFX  7772 Y 1
SFX  7772 0 טינו/64993 .
SFX  10916 Y 1
SFX  10916 0 טינו/64994 .
SFX  7366 Y 1
SFX  7366 ד ידהו/64992 .
SFX  7299 Y 1
SFX  7299 0 רתיה/64992 .
SFX  8309 Y 1
SFX  8309 0 עיהם/64991 .
SFX  6219 Y 1
SFX  6219 0 זכן/64991 .
SFX  6648 Y 1
SFX  6648 0 זכן/64992 .
SFX  5772 Y 1
SFX  5772 0 זכן/64993 .
SFX  7238 Y 1
SFX  7238 0 עיהם/64993 .
SFX  12140 Y 1
SFX  12140 0 נותיה/64991 .
SFX  12039 Y 1
SFX  12039 0 יבתן/64991 .
SFX  11116 Y 1
SFX  11116 0 זכן/64998 .
SFX  10659 Y 1
SFX  10659 0 יבתן/64992 .
SFX  10637 Y 1
SFX  10637 0 נותיה/64992 .
SFX  12768 Y 1
SFX  12768 ח יעכן/64991 .
SFX  9220 Y 1
SFX  9220 0 לק/64991 .
SFX  7120 Y 1
SFX  7120 0 נותיה/64993 .
SFX  6513 Y 1
SFX  6513 0 גנו/64991 .
SFX  6679 Y 1
SFX  6679 ח יעכן/64992 .
SFX  6152 Y 1
SFX  6152 0 לק/64992 .
SFX  6043 Y 1
SFX  6043 0 גנו/64992 .
SFX  11215 Y 1
SFX  11215 ח יעכן/64993 .
SFX  10982 Y 1
SFX  10982 0 לק/64993 .
SFX  7651 Y 1
SFX  7651 0 גנו/64993 .
SFX  6911 Y 1
SFX  6911 ד ודו/64993 .
SFX  10547 Y 1
SFX  10547 0 גנו/64998 .
SFX  9993 Y 1
SFX  9993 ח יעכן/64998 .
SFX  11449 Y 1
SFX  11449 0 גנו/64999 .
SFX  13315 Y 1
SFX  13315 0 שתי/64991 .
SFX  6290 Y 1
SFX  6290 0 שתי/64992 .
SFX  8949 Y 1
SFX  8949 0 שתי/64993 .
SFX  8266 Y 1
SFX  8266 0 מתנו/64991 .
SFX  9261 Y 1
SFX  9261 0 מתנו/64992 .
SFX  13908 Y 1
SFX  13908 ט יטי/64992 .
SFX  6854 Y 1
SFX  6854 0 מתנו/64993 .
SFX  13010 Y 1
SFX  13010 ט יטי/64993 .
SFX  10057 Y 1
SFX  10057 ט יטי/64995 .
SFX  9562 Y 1
SFX  9562 0 עתוך/64992 .
SFX  12728 Y 1
SFX  12728 0 יטיו/64991 .
SFX  13519 Y 1
SFX  13519 0 יטיו/64993 .
SFX  12588 Y 1
SFX  12588 0 יפיהם/64991 .
SFX  9970 Y 1
SFX  9970 ב גרו/64992 .
SFX  13412 Y 1
SFX  13412 0 יפיהם/64993 .
SFX  9493 Y 1
SFX  9493 0 יטוה/64992 .
SFX  7297 Y 1
SFX  7297 0 רתיו/64992 .
SFX  8848 Y 1
SFX  8848 0 חוני/64992 .
SFX  13185 Y 1
SFX  13185 0 חוני/64993 .
